District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2104

Collections or reimbursements of charges to be credited to District.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 917, ch. 149
July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 309, ch. 209, § 1
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(w)
1981 Ed., § 32-604.
1973 Ed., § 32-404.
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.